Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5638YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2026 Section 1. Section 1B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 1B.3 Flags on public buildings. 3 1. It shall be the duty of any A board of public officers 4 charged with providing supplies for a public building in the 5 state to shall provide a suitable state flag , and it shall be 6 the duty of the custodian of that public building to shall 7 raise the flags of the United States of America and the state 8 of Iowa , upon each secular day when weather conditions are 9 favorable. 10 2. On a state-owned or public school building and the 11 associated grounds, a custodian of the building is authorized 12 to raise only the flags of the United States of America, the 13 state of Iowa, and the national league of POW/MIA families. 14